Idaho, session 2025, H0125.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-6402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-6402. RIOT -- FELONY -- MISDEMEANOR -- PUNISHMENT. (1) A riot is a
felony if:
(a) It occurs on or about the state penitentiary, a county or city
jail, or any other penal facility in this state, or it involves the tak-
ing of one (1) or more hostages. Violation of the provisions of this
subsection paragraph is punishable by imprisonment in the state peni-
tentiary for not less than five (5) years, no nor more than twenty (20)
years, or a fine not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000),
or both such fine and imprisonment.;
(b) The destruction or damage to public or private property exceeds
five hundred dollars ($500). Violation of the provisions of this
subsection paragraph is punishable by imprisonment in the state pen-
itentiary for not more than five (5) years or a fine not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), or both such fine and imprisonment.; or
(c) It results in physical injury to any person. Violation of the pro-
visions of this paragraph is punishable by imprisonment in the state
penitentiary for not more than five (5) years or a fine not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), or both such fine and imprisonment.
(2) A riot is a misdemeanor in all other circumstances punishable by im-
prisonment in the city or county jail for not more than one (1) year and a fine
not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.